Missouri, session 2026, HB2305.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 8, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 8.981, to read as follows:
8.981. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Construction project", any publicly funded construction, renovation, or
improvement of public infrastructure, buildings, or works including, but not limited to,
roads, bridges, or other transportation projects, that are funded in whole or in part by a
political subdivision of this state;
(2) "Electronic bid procurement system", any secure, government-approved
platform or system that facilitates the electronic submission of bids including, but not
limited to, a platform or system similar to any electronic procurement system used by
the office of administration on the effective date of this section;
(3) "Political subdivision", any county, municipality, city, town, or other
governmental entity within the state of Missouri authorized to undertake publicly
funded construction projects.
2. (1) All political subdivisions undertaking construction projects shall allow
contractors and vendors the option to submit bids electronically using an electronic bid
procurement system or other secure electronic delivery methods.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2305 2
(2) The electronic bid submission system shall comply with the uniform
electronic transactions act established in sections 432.200 to 432.295 and shall ensure the
enforceability of electronic records and signatures under section 432.230.
3. (1) Each political subdivision advertising for bids on applicable construction
projects shall:
(a) Publish a notice on a publicly accessible online portal, such as the political
subdivision's official website or an electronic bid procurement system; and
(b) Provide notification through an electronic medium, such as a public e-
procurement platform or relevant online bid boards, to ensure accessibility to
prospective bidders.
(2) At the discretion of the political subdivision, additional notice may be posted
in local or regional newspapers of general circulation or announced through public or
minority business outreach channels.
(3) The solicitation notice shall include all necessary information regarding the
bid submission process, deadlines, electronic submission instructions, and any other
requirements for prospective bidders.
4. (1) Political subdivisions shall implement security measures to:
(a) Verify the identity of bidders;
(b) Ensure confidentiality of bid contents; and
(c) Prevent unauthorized access or tampering.
(2) Acceptable security measures may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Digital signatures compliant with section 432.230;
(b) Encryption protocols; or
(c) Other security technologies adhering to industry standards.
(3) All electronic bid submissions shall remain secure and accessible to the
public at the specified time for the opening of bids in compliance with chapter 34.
5. (1) Political subdivisions accepting electronic bid submissions shall provide an
electronic receipt to the bidder at the time of submission.
(2) The receipt shall include the date and time of submission and may be:
(a) Immediately transmitted to the bidder via email or other electronic
notification; or
(b) Accessible to the bidder in an online system where it can be viewed and
printed.
6. (1) The office of administration shall develop and issue guidelines to assist
political subdivisions in implementing secure electronic bid submission processes. Such
guidelines shall be issued no later than one year after the effective date of this section.

HB 2305 3
(2) The office of administration may recommend specific digital platforms,
security protocols, and compliance measures to ensure compliance with this section.
Any electronic procurement system used by the office of administration on the effective
date of this section or similar systems may be referenced as examples of compliant
platforms.
(3) The office of administration shall consult with political subdivisions,
contractors, and industry experts during the development of such guidelines to ensure
practical and effective implementation.
✔